Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-501
Common carrier, declaration; commission jurisdiction; rules and regulations; validity.

Any person who transports, transmits, conveys, or stores liquid or gas by pipeline for hire in Nebraska intrastate commerce shall be a common carrier subject to commission regulation. The commission shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce reasonable rules and regulations establishing minimum state safety standards for the design, construction, maintenance, and operation of pipelines which transport liquefied petroleum gas or anhydrous ammonia in intrastate commerce by common carriers. Such rules and regulations, and the interpretations thereof, shall conform with the rules, regulations, and interpretations of the appropriate federal agencies with authority to regulate pipeline common carriers in interstate commerce. Any person may determine the validity of any such rule or regulation in such manner as provided by law.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. V, § 1, p. 1416;

Laws 1969, c. 608, § 1, p. 2474;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 97.